Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 22. Plant Materials Center.

Revisor’s notes. —

In ch. 138, SLA 1972, AS 03.22 was incorrectly designated AS 03.65.

Sec. 03.22.010.
Establishment of plant materials center.

The Department of Natural Resources, in cooperation with the college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station, shall establish and maintain a plant materials center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station” for “Institute of Agricultural Sciences”.

Sec. 03.22.020.
Purpose of center.

The objectives of the plant materials center, in cooperation with the college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station, are to

assemble, evaluate, select, and increase plant materials needed in soil and water conservation, agriculture, and industry, and maintain genetic purity of these materials;

increase promising plant materials for field scale testing;

test the promising materials in field plantings on sites that represent soil and climatic conditions not found at the center;

maintain and provide for increase of basic seed stocks of plant materials for agricultural and conservation interests;

make seed and plant materials available, for a fee if necessary, in such a manner as to avoid monopolistic control of basic stocks of these materials and encourage the development of a seed industry, noncommercial transfer of seed, and community seed libraries established under AS

03.20.120

;

support but not duplicate activities carried on by state or federally funded research programs in the state;

prepare, publish, and disseminate a summary report on all studies as they are completed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in the introductory language, substituted “college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station” for “Institute of Agricultural Sciences”.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 18, 2018, in (5), added “, noncommercial transfer of seed, and community seed libraries established under AS

03.20.120

” at the end.

Sec. 03.22.030.
Center site, buildings, and equipment.

The department shall obtain a site, either by donation, lease, or purchase, and erect suitable buildings on the site, if they are needed for the use of the plant materials center.
The department shall also acquire the agricultural land, scientific instruments, and equipment necessary to carry on the work of the center.
Acquisition of scientific instruments and equipment under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 03.22.040.
Personnel.

The department shall ensure that competent professional, secretarial, and subprofessional personnel necessary to carry on the work of the center are employed. The administrator of the plant materials center is a joint appointment between the Department of Natural Resources and the college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station” for “University of Alaska Agricultural Experiment Station”.

Sec. 03.22.050.
Department to cooperate.

The department shall cooperate with the college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station and the United States Department of Agriculture, Natural Resources Conservation Service, by a formal memorandum of understanding and may cooperate with any department or agency of federal, state, or local government, research organization, or other organization concerned with conservation or agriculture.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “college or department of the University of Alaska responsible for the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station” for “Institute of Agricultural Sciences”.

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “United States Department of Agriculture, Natural Resources Conservation Service” for “United States Soil Conservation Service”.

Sec. 03.22.060.
Reports.

The department shall annually prepare a detailed report of the operation of the center and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include a statement of all receipts and disbursements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 03.22.070.
Acceptance of assistance.

The department may request, accept, and receive from federal, state, and nongovernment sources financial and other aid and assistance, including personnel and equipment, for the construction, equipment, maintenance, and operation of the center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972)

Sec. 03.22.080.
Payments and vouchers.

Appropriations made by the state for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the center shall be expended upon vouchers approved by the department in the manner prescribed by it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1972)